Utah statutes.
72-10-415.   Severability clause.
If any provision of this part or its application to any person or
circumstances is held invalid, this invalidity does not affect the provisions
or applications of the part which can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this part are
declared to be severable.
